Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-546
Waterworks; additional tax; provision cumulative.

The right and power to provide the fund mentioned in section 17-545 for such purposes shall in no way prevent said cities of the second class and villages from providing in whole or in part for the expense of such hydrants, and of pumping and supplying through them water for public purposes, in any other manner now provided by law.

Laws 1915, c. 217, § 2, p. 486;

C.S.1922, § 4295;

C.S.1929, § 17-444;

R.S.1943, § 17-546.